District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.35

Voting of shares — Vacancies.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 193, ch. 269, § 35
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 241, Pub. L. 86-106, § 8
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.35.
1981 Ed., § 29-335.
1973 Ed., § 29-916c.